public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-xpi - old/dictionaries/venetan.aff
FLAG long
# vèrbi '-er inregolari ((bene|d[ei]x|ind|inter|kontra|ma[lƚ]e|pre|re)díxer)
# themeT1 + er/d0d1d2b5b6b7P0P1P2
# themeT5 + rò/d0d1d2b5b6b7I0
SFX b5 Y 64
SFX b5 erò éndome/P6 xerò
SFX b5 erò éndomene/P6 xerò
SFX b5 erò éntome/P6 xerò
SFX b5 erò éntomene/P6 xerò
SFX b5 xer gone/I1 xer	is:interrogative
SFX b5 xerò ga xerò
SFX b5 xerò gando/P0 xerò
SFX b5 xerò gi/P3I2 xerò
SFX b5 xerò go/I0 xerò
SFX b5 xerò gàndome/P6 xerò
SFX b5 xerò gàndomene/P6 xerò
SFX b5 xerò gàntome/P6 xerò
SFX b5 xerò gàntomene/P6 xerò
SFX b5 xerò r/P0 xerò
SFX b5 xerò rave/P3 xerò	ts:conditional_present
SFX b5 xerò re xerò
SFX b5 xerò remo/P0I0 xerò
SFX b5 xerò ren/I0 xerò
SFX b5 xerò rense xerò
SFX b5 xerò rensi xerò
SFX b5 xerò resi/I4 xerò
SFX b5 xerò resiu/I5 xerò
SFX b5 xerò rimo/P0I0 xerò
SFX b5 xerò rion/I0 xerò
SFX b5 xerò rione/I1 xerò
SFX b5 xerò rionse xerò
SFX b5 xerò risen/I0 xerò
SFX b5 xerò risense xerò
SFX b5 xerò risensi xerò
SFX b5 xerò risi/I4 xerò
SFX b5 xerò rision/I0 xerò
SFX b5 xerò risione/I1 xerò	is:interrogative
SFX b5 xerò risionse xerò
SFX b5 xerò risiu/I5 xerò
SFX b5 xerò risié/I4 xerò
SFX b5 xerò risiéu/I5 xerò
SFX b5 xerò rison/I0 xerò
SFX b5 xerò risone/I1 xerò	is:interrogative
SFX b5 xerò risonse xerò
SFX b5 xerò rié/I4 xerò
SFX b5 xerò riéu/I5 xerò
SFX b5 xerò ron/P0I0 xerò
SFX b5 xerò rone/I1 xerò	is:interrogative
SFX b5 xerò ronme/P6 xerò
SFX b5 xerò rà/P3I0I2 xerò
SFX b5 xerò ràe/P3 xerò	ts:conditional_present
SFX b5 xerò ràvene/I1 xerò	is:interrogative
SFX b5 xerò rè/I0 xerò
SFX b5 xerò rène/I1 xerò	is:interrogative
SFX b5 xerò ré/I4 xerò
SFX b5 xerò résimo/I0 xerò
SFX b5 xerò résimoe/I1 xerò
SFX b5 xerò résitu/I3 xerò	is:interrogative
SFX b5 xerò réu/I5 xerò
SFX b5 xerò rí/I4 xerò
SFX b5 xerò ría/I0I2 xerò
SFX b5 xerò rèe/P3I0I2 xerò
SFX b5 xerò ríane/I1 xerò	is:interrogative
SFX b5 xerò ríatu/I3 xerò	is:interrogative
SFX b5 xerò ríe/P3I0I2 xerò
SFX b5 xerò ríene/I1 xerò	is:interrogative
SFX b5 xerò rísitu/I3 xerò	is:interrogative
SFX b5 xerò rò/I0 xerò
SFX b5 xerò rónmene/P6 xerò

# vèrbi '-er inregolari ((bene|d[ei]x|ind|inter|kontra|ma[lƚ]e|pre|re)díxer)
# themeT1 + er/d0d1d2b5b6b7P0P1P2
# themeT5 + rò/d0d1d2b5b6b7I0
SFX b6 Y 26
SFX b6 erò éndolo/P7 xerò
SFX b6 erò éndomelo/P7 xerò
SFX b6 erò éntolo/P7 xerò
SFX b6 erò éntomelo/P7 xerò
SFX b6 ixerò ígelo/A1 ixerò
SFX b6 xerò ge-lo/A1 xerò
SFX b6 xerò gando/P1 xerò
SFX b6 xerò gàndolo/P7 xerò
SFX b6 xerò gàndomelo/P7 xerò
SFX b6 xerò gàntolo/P7 xerò
SFX b6 xerò gàntomelo/P7 xerò
SFX b6 xerò r/P1 xerò
SFX b6 xerò ralo/A1 xerò
SFX b6 xerò rave-lo/A1 xerò
SFX b6 xerò rà-lo/A1 xerò
SFX b6 xerò ràe-lo/A1 xerò
SFX b6 xerò ràelo/A1 xerò
SFX b6 xerò ràvelo/A1 xerò
SFX b6 xerò remo/P1 xerò
SFX b6 xerò rimo/P1 xerò
SFX b6 xerò ríe-lo/A1 xerò
SFX b6 xerò ríelo/A1 xerò
SFX b6 xerò ríselo/I8 xerò
SFX b6 xerò ron/P1 xerò
SFX b6 xerò ronme/P7 xerò
SFX b6 xerò rónmelo/P7 xerò

# vèrbi '-er inregolari ((bene|d[ei]x|ind|inter|kontra|ma[lƚ]e|pre|re)díxer)
# themeT1 + er/d0d1d2b5b6b7P0P1P2
# themeT5 + rò/d0d1d2b5b6b7I0
SFX b7 Y 25
SFX b7 erò éndomeƚo/P8 xerò
SFX b7 erò éndoƚo/P8 xerò
SFX b7 erò éntomeƚo/P8 xerò
SFX b7 erò éntoƚo/P8 xerò
SFX b7 ixerò ígeƚo/A1 ixerò
SFX b7 xerò ge-ƚo/A1 xerò
SFX b7 xerò gàndomeƚo/P8 xerò
SFX b7 xerò gando/P2 xerò
SFX b7 xerò gàndoƚo/P8 xerò
SFX b7 xerò gàntomeƚo/P8 xerò
SFX b7 xerò gàntoƚo/P8 xerò
SFX b7 xerò r/P2 xerò
SFX b7 xerò rave-ƚo/A1 xerò
SFX b7 xerò raƚo/A1 xerò
SFX b7 xerò rà-ƚo/A1 xerò
SFX b7 xerò ràe-ƚo/A1 xerò
SFX b7 xerò ràeƚo/A1 xerò
SFX b7 xerò ràveƚo/A1 xerò
SFX b7 xerò remo/P2 xerò
SFX b7 xerò rimo/P2 xerò
SFX b7 xerò ríe-ƚo/A1 xerò
SFX b7 xerò ríeƚo/A1 xerò
SFX b7 xerò ríseƚo/I9 xerò
SFX b7 xerò ron/P2 xerò
SFX b7 xerò rónmeƚo/P8 xerò
